Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6840
Health care facility, defined.

Health care facility means a general acute hospital, satellite emergency department, or ambulatory surgical center licensed pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 7.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.